ch_lexd.lexd
LEXICON AdjAttrAbs
базаран[OblSame]
театральни[OblSame]
пулеметни[OblSame]
ботанически[OblSame]
элементарни[OblSame]
тийла[OblSame]
психиатрически[OblSame]
астрономически[OblSame]
маьхьаран[OblSame]
кӀиранан[OblSame]
квадратни[OblSame]
оперни[OblSame]
уллохь[OblSame]
больнични[OblSame]
отчетни[OblSame]
меньшевистски[OblSame]
материалистически[OblSame]
галантерейни[OblSame]
адаман[OblSame]
дагахь[OblSame]
июльски[OblSame]
политехнически[OblSame]
пулемѐтни[OblSame]
апельсинан[OblSame]
филологически[OblSame]
паспортни[OblSame]
машинан[OblSame]
фотографически[OblSame]
школьни[OblSame]
баллистически[OblSame]
аджарски[OblSame]
геологически[OblSame]
электрически[OblSame]
факультативни[OblSame]
ойланан[OblSame]
догцIена[OblSame]
марехь[OblSame]
фосфорни[OblSame]
архитектурни[OblSame]
кегийн[OblSame]
автономни[OblSame]
кремлѐвски[OblSame]
коллективни[OblSame]
лахаюккъехь[OblSame]
оппортунистски[OblSame]
информационни[OblSame]
совгӀатан[OblSame]
политически[OblSame]
сменни[OblSame]
тIехь[OblSame]
писательски[OblSame]
аполитични[OblSame]
эскадронни[OblSame]
слесарни[OblSame]
лекторски[OblSame]
артистически[OblSame]
оппортунистически[OblSame]
борзанан[OblSame]
биографически[OblSame]
тезетахь[OblSame]
азотни[OblSame]
фински[OblSame]
дешначохь[OblSame]
юкъараллин-политически[OblSame]
аспирантски[OblSame]
композиторски[OblSame]
материальни[OblSame]
метафизически[OblSame]
активни[OblSame]
дискуссионни[OblSame]
кандидатски[OblSame]
арифметически[OblSame]
директивни[OblSame]
полиграфически[OblSame]
монументальни[OblSame]
муьтӀахь[OblSame]
къоранан[OblSame]
бӀан[OblSame]
космически[OblSame]
кубически[OblSame]
диалектни[OblSame]
перманентни[OblSame]
профессорски[OblSame]
кIелахь[OblSame]
мангалан[OblSame]
коньячни[OblSame]
катастрофически[OblSame]
идейни[OblSame]
лахаэвлахь[OblSame]
клинически[OblSame]
краеведчески[OblSame]
индустриальни[OblSame]
посылочни[OblSame]
антарктически[OblSame]
зоологически[OblSame]
январски[OblSame]
комически[OblSame]
шурула-кIайн[OblSame]
пенсионни[OblSame]
микроскопически[OblSame]
парижски[OblSame]
атмосферни[OblSame]
учѐтни[OblSame]
авторски[OblSame]
буржуазни[OblSame]
коммуникационни[OblSame]
дика[OblSame]
пассажирски[OblSame]
кинематографически[OblSame]
алкогольни[OblSame]
заочни[OblSame]
большевистски[OblSame]
латински[OblSame]
профессиональни[OblSame]
тӀеман[OblSame]
территориальни[OblSame]
колхозни[OblSame]
диалектико-материалистически[OblSame]
гурахь[OblSame]
арифметйчески[OblSame]
контурни[OblSame]
купечески[OblSame]
подвальни[OblSame]
плакатни[OblSame]
зуьнан[OblSame]
акционерни[OblSame]
метеорологически[OblSame]
нагахь[OblSame]
делегатски[OblSame]
кадетски[OblSame]
оьнан[OblSame]
психологически[OblSame]
академически[OblSame]
лахахь[OblSame]
плацкартни[OblSame]
фашистски[OblSame]
монархически[OblSame]
дилхалахь[OblSame]
ассистентски[OblSame]
документальни[OblSame]
билетни[OblSame]
дийннахьехь[OblSame]
культурни[OblSame]
гвардейски[OblSame]
адресни[OblSame]
стен[OblSame]
сийлахь[OblSame]
галстучни[OblSame]
артельни[OblSame]
шар-шарахь[OblSame]
кафедральни[OblSame]
комендантски[OblSame]
арктически[OblSame]
лакхаэвлахь[OblSame]
гонан[OblSame]
бӀостанан[OblSame]
монгольски[OblSame]
производственни[OblSame]
дуганан[OblSame]
дехкан[OblSame]
капитански[OblSame]
дийнан[OblSame]
практически[OblSame]
процессуальни[OblSame]
юнан[OblSame]
комсомольски[OblSame]
бюрократически[OblSame]
первобытни[OblSame]
анкетни[OblSame]
пана[OblSame]
горчични[OblSame]
марксистско-ленински[OblSame]
лекционни[OblSame]
беданан[OblSame]
хьекъалан[OblSame]
романтически[OblSame]
ленински[OblSame]
комитетски[OblSame]
федеративни[OblSame]
поэтически[OblSame]
меттан[OblSame]
алгебраически[OblSame]
къен[OblSame]
генеральски[OblSame]
тоффинехь[OblSame]
дегтаьрни[OblSame]
динан[OblSame]
орденски[OblSame]
августовски[OblSame]
беранан[OblSame]
контрастни[OblSame]
фельдшерски[OblSame]
опереточни[OblSame]
этимологически[OblSame]
зенитни[OblSame]
автобиографически[OblSame]
вертикальни[OblSame]
журнальни[OblSame]
перпендикулярни[OblSame]
просветительни[OblSame]
пунктирни[OblSame]
багажни[OblSame]
патентни[OblSame]
хьуьнан[OblSame]
буьнан[OblSame]
аварийни[OblSame]
крахмальни[OblSame]
хенахь[OblSame]
комплексни[OblSame]
телеграфни[OblSame]
красноармейски[OblSame]
борзан[OblSame]
гидротехнически[OblSame]
хIетахь[OblSame]
тап[OblSame]
цIарула-цIен[OblSame]
геофизически[OblSame]
депутатски[OblSame]
марксистски[OblSame]
ахколониальни[OblSame]
трамвайни[OblSame]
морса[OblSame]
партийни[OblSame]
гов-гиввехь[OblSame]
капитальни[OblSame]
цIéн[OblSame]
хьошалгIахь[OblSame]
арендни[OblSame]
марочни[OblSame]
метрически[OblSame]
географически[OblSame]
гениальни[OblSame]
пролетарски[OblSame]
книжни[OblSame]
оппозиционни[OblSame]
ракетни[OblSame]
яйн[OblSame]
венгерски[OblSame]
афгански[OblSame]
геодезически[OblSame]
карельски[OblSame]
оптически[OblSame]
декъан[OblSame]
Iилманан-практически[OblSame]
пионерски[OblSame]
фамильни[OblSame]
тоффехь[OblSame]
хозрасчѐтни[OblSame]
археологически[OblSame]
министерски[OblSame]
комиссионни[OblSame]
рафинадни[OblSame]
гӀалгӀайн[OblSame]
волейбольни[OblSame]
испански[OblSame]
кристаллически[OblSame]
канцелярски[OblSame]
пис[OblSame]
гостинични[OblSame]
маьI-маьIIехь[OblSame]
гаечни[OblSame]
антифашистски[OblSame]
коллегиальни[OblSame]
коммунальни[OblSame]
австрийски[OblSame]
комедийни[OblSame]
наг-наггахь[OblSame]
декабрьски[OblSame]
аристократически[OblSame]
юьртахь[OblSame]
моторни[OblSame]
динахь[OblSame]
ремонтни[OblSame]
госпитальни[OblSame]
австралийски[OblSame]
позиционни[OblSame]
маршальски[OblSame]
башкирски[OblSame]
доменни[OblSame]
хеннахь[OblSame]
физико-математически[OblSame]
советски[OblSame]
интернациональни[OblSame]
делкъехь[OblSame]
айдардешан[OblSame]
авиаторски[OblSame]
полицейски[OblSame]
концентрационни[OblSame]
дезинфекционни[OblSame]
мичурински[OblSame]
профсоюзни[OblSame]
мартовски[OblSame]
водородни[OblSame]
демократически[OblSame]
синонимични[OblSame]
шен[OblSame]
кислородни[OblSame]
азиатски[OblSame]
антагонистически[OblSame]
матриархальни[OblSame]
бахаман[OblSame]
станични[OblSame]
опиумни[OblSame]
новкъахь[OblSame]
июньски[OblSame]
походни[OblSame]
дефицитни[OblSame]
эстетически[OblSame]
масалан[OblSame]
авиационни[OblSame]
ученан[OblSame]
бедан[OblSame]
пассивни[OblSame]
квитанционни[OblSame]
мелкособственнически[OblSame]
юкъаршлахь[OblSame]
патриотически[OblSame]
технически[OblSame]
артиллерийски[OblSame]
районни[OblSame]
физкультурни[OblSame]
ответственни[OblSame]
библиотечни[OblSame]
африкански[OblSame]
биологически[OblSame]
ремонтно-механически[OblSame]
гӀунан[OblSame]
меран[OblSame]
аламан[OblSame]
конвейерни[OblSame]
английски[OblSame]
принципиальни[OblSame]
квартальни[OblSame]
лакхаюккъехь[OblSame]
дивизионни[OblSame]
пластически[OblSame]
психически[OblSame]
лулахь[OblSame]
варварски[OblSame]
октябрьски[OblSame]
моьнан[OblSame]
орфографически[OblSame]
идейно-политически[OblSame]
балетни[OblSame]
фонетически[OblSame]
ген[OblSame]
заьӀапан[OblSame]
варен[OblSame]
беран[OblSame]
болатан[OblSame]
некъан[OblSame]
делккъехь[OblSame]
докторски[OblSame]
цхьа[OblSame]
кхузахь[OblSame]
актѐрски[OblSame]
анархистски[OblSame]
десятични[OblSame]
хенан[OblSame]
мистически[OblSame]
анархически[OblSame]
ден[OblSame]
химически[OblSame]
колониальни[OblSame]
жерахь[OblSame]
прогрессивни[OblSame]
юкъахь[OblSame]
физиологически[OblSame]
актуальни[OblSame]
гучохь[OblSame]
процентни[OblSame]
диссертационни[OblSame]
цIахь[OblSame]
февральски[OblSame]
европейски[OblSame]
батальонни[OblSame]
прокурорски[OblSame]
мелкобуржуазни[OblSame]
диетически[OblSame]
директорски[OblSame]
проблемни[OblSame]
доьшучохь[OblSame]
паркетни[OblSame]
социалистически[OblSame]
гарехь[OblSame]
белхалойн[OblSame]
националистически[OblSame]
ирригационни[OblSame]
тарни[OblSame]
анатомически[OblSame]
курортни[OblSame]
педагогически[OblSame]
леганан[OblSame]
атеистически[OblSame]
лакированни[OblSame]
молекулярни[OblSame]
сагалан[OblSame]
газированни[OblSame]
пружинни[OblSame]
кадамехь[OblSame]
партизански[OblSame]
цӀен[OblSame]
мандатни[OblSame]
апрельски[OblSame]
музыкальни[OblSame]
маршрутни[OblSame]
королевски[OblSame]
йийн[OblSame]
каникулярни[OblSame]
коммунистически[OblSame]
юбилейни[OblSame]
алюминийн[OblSame]
исторически[OblSame]
оккупационни[OblSame]
критически[OblSame]
центральни[OblSame]
тIéда[OblSame]
парашютни[OblSame]
догӀанан[OblSame]
морфологически[OblSame]
синтаксически[OblSame]
диагональни[OblSame]
оптимистически[OblSame]
дирша[OblSame]
организациояни[OblSame]
капиталистически[OblSame]
кӀен[OblSame]
мелкотоварни[OblSame]
Iахар[OblSame]
парламентски[OblSame]
методически[OblSame]
медальни[OblSame]
графически[OblSame]
патриархальни[OblSame]
литературоведчески[OblSame]
беттан[OblSame]
харжамин[OblSame]
хирургически[OblSame]
этнографически[OblSame]
сентябрьски[OblSame]
синонимйчески[OblSame]
зоотехнически[OblSame]
куйнан[OblSame]
металлически[OblSame]
колонизаторски[OblSame]
сарахь[OblSame]
автомобильни[OblSame]
параллельни[OblSame]
курьерски[OblSame]
хьасттагIехь[OblSame]
монархистски[OblSame]
апелляционни[OblSame]
бертахь[OblSame]
агрессивни[OblSame]
шехеннахь[OblSame]
мокха[OblSame]
омонимически[OblSame]
аптечни[OblSame]
диверсионни[OblSame]
скульптурни[OblSame]
адмиральски[OblSame]
декретни[OblSame]
агрономически[OblSame]
адыгейски[OblSame]
позитивни[OblSame]
китайски[OblSame]
туберкулѐзни[OblSame]
мраморни[OblSame]
тӀеран[OblSame]
посольски[OblSame]
дипломатически[OblSame]
буьйран[OblSame]
лирически[OblSame]
бактериологически[OblSame]
казахски[OblSame]
математически[OblSame]
эфиопски[OblSame]
дипломни[OblSame]
командирски[OblSame]
шовинистически[OblSame]
чохь[OblSame]
дилхан[OblSame]
орфоэпйчески[OblSame]
кхахьпанан[OblSame]
краснофлотски[OblSame]
клюквенни[OblSame]
реакционни[OblSame]
тӀаьхьенан[OblSame]
египетски[OblSame]
кабельни[OblSame]
протокольни[OblSame]
архивни[OblSame]
албански[OblSame]
матросски[OblSame]
империалистически[OblSame]
колхозехь[OblSame]
классически[OblSame]
кабинетни[OblSame]
бежан[OblSame]
контрреволюционни[OblSame]
коммерчески[OblSame]
автоматически[OblSame]
сийлахь[OblSame]
цхьанаггахь[OblSame]
мекханан[OblSame]
полярни[OblSame]
ноябрьски[OblSame]
пехотни[OblSame]
катаральни[OblSame]
диалектически[OblSame]
кавказски[OblSame]
кIайн[OblSame]
артезиански[OblSame]
атомни[OblSame]
турбинни[OblSame]
дебиторски[OblSame]
гIехь[OblSame]
терминологически[OblSame]
кIон[OblSame]
белхаргахь[OblSame]
белорусски[OblSame]
десантни[OblSame]
дийнахь[OblSame]
тракторни[OblSame]
банковски[OblSame]
классни[OblSame]
консервни[OblSame]
енан[OblSame]
официальни[OblSame]
дайн[OblSame]
каракалпакски[OblSame]
итальянски[OblSame]
дагаран[OblSame]
аренан[OblSame]
аптекарски[OblSame]
декхарийлахь[OblSame]
генеральни[OblSame]
дечиган[OblSame]
граждански[OblSame]
маӀаран[OblSame]
хакасски[OblSame]
металлургически[OblSame]
суворовски[OblSame]
наггахь[OblSame]
машин[OblSame]
парфюмерни[OblSame]
пиратски[OblSame]
дагестански[OblSame]
фольклорни[OblSame]
цигахь[OblSame]
диспетчерски[OblSame]
эстонски[OblSame]
миномѐтни[OblSame]
антични[OblSame]
перронни[OblSame]
теоретически[OblSame]
парламентѐрски[OblSame]
революционни[OblSame]
барометрически[OblSame]
формалистически[OblSame]
календарни[OblSame]
операционни[OblSame]
корпусни[OblSame]
дикторски[OblSame]
милицейски[OblSame]
эстрадни[OblSame]
молдавански[OblSame]
арахь[OblSame]
диаметральни[OblSame]
тIéхьахь[OblSame]
административни[OblSame]
геометрически[OblSame]
композиционни[OblSame]
философски[OblSame]
карнавальни[OblSame]
туристически[OblSame]
союзни[OblSame]
Iаьржа[OblChu]
можа-хьаьрса[OblChu]
цхьалха[OblChu]
хьанал[OblChu]
цIасталера[OblChu]
билгал[OblChu]
меда[OblChu]
дашо[OblChu]
каде[OblChu]
къора[OblChu]
бIаьрла[OblChu]
тера[OblChu]
дIаьвше[OblChu]
хьарам[OblChu]
гóма[OblChu]
иштта[OblChu]
бегIийла[OblChu]
ирча[OblChu]
сирла-можа[OblChu]
дастама[OblSame]
тешаме[OblChu]
реза[OblChu]
баьсса[OblChu]
нилха[OblChu]
осал[OblChu]
таханлера[OblChu]
сирла[OblChu]
пхуьйтталгIа[OblChu]
леткъаме[OblChu]
чоьхьара[OblChu]
тховсалера[OblChu]
хьокъа[OblChu]
хаза[OblChu]
акха[OblChu]
тIéра[OblChu]
даггара[OblChu]
тIехтохаме[OblChu]
